Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 5 LICENSING
44-30-528. Licensees - duty to maintain records.

Each licensee shall keep a complete set of books of account, correspondence, and all other records necessary to show fully the gaming transactions of the licensee, all of which shall be open at all times during business hours for the inspection and examination of the division or its duly authorized representatives. The division may require any licensee to furnish any information that the division considers necessary for the proper administration of this article 30 and may require an audit to be made of the books of account and records on any occasion that the division considers necessary by an auditor, selected by the commission or the director, who shall likewise have access to all the books and records of the licensee, and the licensee may be required to pay the expense thereof.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 195, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-529 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-529. Businesses operating in compliance with section 18-10-105 (1.5).

Nothing in this article 30 shall be construed to affect a manufacturer who, prior to June 4, 1991, was operating a business in compliance with section 18-10-105 (1.5).

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 195, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-530 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-530. Payments of winnings - intercept.

Before making a payment of cash gaming winnings for which the licensee is required to file form W-2G, or a substantially equivalent form, with the United States internal revenue service, a licensee shall comply with the requirements of article 33 of this title 44.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 195, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-531 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-531. Responsible gaming - advertising and promotional efforts - reports of certain licensees required - confidential records.

On or before October 1, 2023, and on or before October 1 each year thereafter, the following licensees shall submit to the director a report that describes the efforts of the licensee in the preceding state fiscal year to promote responsible gaming in the state via advertising and other promotional methods and the licensee's plans concerning such promotional efforts in the current state fiscal year:

Retail licensees, as described in section 44-30-501 (1)(c);

Sports betting operators, as defined in section 44-30-1501 (11); and

Internet sports betting operators, as defined in section 44-30-1501 (5).

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a report submitted to the director pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is confidential and is not subject to the requirements of the "Colorado Open Records Act", part 2 of article 72 of title 24.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1402), ch. 402, p. 2865, § 2, effective August 10.